Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2540
Other bond provisions applicable.

The issue of refunding bonds, the manner of sale, the maturities, interest rates, form, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the joint public agency in respect of the same shall be governed by the Joint Public Agency Act relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 40.